Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.040

Operation of chapter if in conflict with federal law.

If any part of this chapter is found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a condition precedent to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such findings or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter in its application to the agencies concerned.

[ 1988 c 288 s 104; 1959 c 234 s 19. Formerly RCW 34.04.930.]